Illinois, session 104th, SB4115.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 7Abraham Lincoln Presidential Library and Museum for ordinary 8and contingent expenses including grants:9  Payable from the General Revenue Fund............11,314,50010  Payable from the Presidential Library11   and Museum Operating Fund........................3,900,00012  Payable from the Tourism Promotion Fund...........7,113,300 13    Section 10. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 14as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Presidential 15Library and Museum Operating Fund to the Abraham Lincoln 16Presidential Library and Museum for the expenditure of awards 17received to support the operations and programming of the 18Abraham Lincoln Presidential Library and Museum. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 202026.